Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.454

Additional powers—Parking meter revenue for revenue bonds.

All second-class cities and towns are authorized to use parking meter revenue as a base for obtaining revenue bonds for use in improvement of streets, roads, alleys, and such other related public works.

[ 1994 c 81 s 44; 1965 c 7 s 35.24.305. Prior: 1957 c 166 s 1. Formerly RCW 35.24.305.]